Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5457YH (5) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2421 Section 1. Section 234.12, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. a. If the United States department 3 of agriculture ceases to transfer moneys to the department 4 of health and human services for supplemental nutrition 5 assistance program benefits due to a failure of the United 6 States government to appropriate moneys for the program 7 during any fiscal year, the department shall reallocate 8 otherwise unexpended or unencumbered moneys appropriated to the 9 department from the general fund of the state for that fiscal 10 year up to the amount of program benefits that would have been 11 issued pursuant to 7 U.S.C. ch. 51 and shall distribute the 12 moneys to eligible households pursuant to 7 U.S.C. ch. 51 until 13 moneys for the program from the United States department of 14 agriculture are received by the department. 15 b. The department shall promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 16 17A to administer this subsection. 17